Colorado statutes. TITLE 5 Consumer Credit Code
PART 2
NOTIFICATION AND FEES

5-6-201. Applicability.

Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, this part 2 applies if a person:

Makes consumer credit sales and charges or collects a finance charge, or makes consumer leases; or

Takes assignments of and undertakes direct collection of payments from, or enforcement of rights against, consumers arising from consumer credit sales or consumer leases.

This part 2 does not apply to supervised lenders described in section 5-1-301 (46), persons making consumer loans described in section 5-1-301 (15), or to persons licensed as collection agencies pursuant to article 16 of this title 5.

Sections 5-6-203 (5) and 5-6-204 of this part 2 apply to all fees collected under this code.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1252, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 09-1141), ch. 41, p. 158, § 4, effective January 1, 2010.

L. 2017:

(2) amended, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1171, § 10, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-6-201, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-6-202. Notification.

Persons subject to this part 2 shall file notification with, and pay the fee prescribed in section 5-6-203 to, the administrator within thirty days after commencing business in this state and, thereafter, on or before January 31 of each year. The notification shall state:

Name of the person;

Name in which business is transacted if different from paragraph (a) of this subsection (1);

Address of principal office, which may be outside this state;

Address of all offices or retail stores, if any, in this state at which consumer credit sales or consumer leases are made or, in the case of a person taking assignments of obligations, the offices or places of business within this state at which business is transacted;

If consumer credit sales or consumer leases are made otherwise than at an office or retail store in this state, a brief description of the manner in which they are made;

Address of designated agent upon whom service of process may be made in this state described in section 5-1-203; and

Whether supervised loans are made.

If information in a notification becomes inaccurate after filing, no further notification is required until the following January 31.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1252, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-6-202, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-6-203. Fees.

A person required to file notification shall, with the first notification and on or before January 31 of each year thereafter, pay to the administrator a nonrefundable annual notification fee. The administrator is entitled to examine the loans, business, and records of such person without issuance of a subpoena.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (HB 09-1141), ch. 41, p. 158, § 5, effective January 1, 2010.)

Persons required to file notification who are assignees of consumer credit sales or consumer leases shall pay an additional nonrefundable annual volume fee on or before January 31 of each year for each one hundred thousand dollars, or part thereof, of the unpaid balances at the time of the assignment of obligations arising from consumer credit sales or consumer leases made in this state and taken by assignment during the preceding calendar year.

A penalty of five dollars per day shall be imposed on any person failing to comply with this section; except that, if the fees required by this section are paid on or before March 1 of each year, no penalty shall be imposed. If a person required to file notification and pay a notification fee fails to do so, the consumer shall have no obligation to pay the finance charge due under the consumer credit transaction, and any finance charges paid shall be refunded to the consumer. In addition, if the administrator examines the loans, business, or records of such person, the person shall pay the reasonable and necessary examination expenses of the administrator.

The administrator shall determine the amount of the notification, volume, and license fees required in this section and in section 5-2-302 and may periodically reduce or increase the amount of one or more of the fees if necessary pursuant to section 24-75-402 (3) and (4), C.R.S., to reduce the uncommitted reserves of the uniform consumer credit code cash fund created in section 5-6-204 to which all or any portion of one or more of the fees is credited.

In accordance with section 24-75-402 (3)(c), C.R.S., for fiscal years prior to July 1, 2018, the uniform consumer credit code cash fund is subject to an alternative maximum reserve of one-third of the amount expended during the previous fiscal year. For fiscal years that begin on or after July 1, 2018, the fund is subject to the maximum reserve established in section 24-75-402, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1253, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (HB 09-1141), ch. 41, p. 158, § 5, effective January 1, 2010.

L. 2010:

(5) amended, (HB 10-1422), ch. 419, p. 2063, § 7, effective August 11.

L. 2015:

(5) amended, (HB 15-1261), ch. 322, p. 1312, § 2, effective June 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-6-203, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-6-204. Cash fund created.

All fees collected under this code and under article 10 of this title 5 shall be credited to the uniform consumer credit code cash fund, which is created and referred to in this section as the "fund", and all money credited to the fund shall be used for the administration and enforcement of this code, article 10 of this title 5, and article 19 of this title 5. Interest earned on the fund shall be credited to the fund. The general assembly shall make annual appropriations out of the fund for the administration and enforcement of this code, article 10 of this title 5, and article 19 of this title 5; except that expenditures by the administrator for consumer and creditor education resulting from the penalties provided in sections 5-2-303 (7)(f), 5-6-109 (1), 5-6-110, and 5-6-114 (2) shall not require appropriation by the general assembly if the expenditures do not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars per fiscal year and do not include the hiring of any full-time equivalents.

Repealed.

Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the state treasurer shall transfer the penalties collected pursuant to section 5-6-114 (1)(a) to the general fund.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1254, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

Entire section amended, p. 30, § 14, effective March 9.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 150, § 1, effective March 27.

L. 2003:

(3) added, p. 454, § 1, effective March 5.

L. 2011:

(4) added, (HB 11-1221), ch. 121, p. 382, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2015:

(2) and (3) repealed, (SB 15-264), ch. 259, p. 941, § 6, effective August 5.

L. 2017:

(1) amended, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1171, § 11, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-6-204, as it existed prior to 2000.